Missouri, session 2026, SB1749.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 640.2000, to read as
follows:
640.2000. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of natural resources the "State Office of
Archaeology" which shall work in conjunction with the state
historic preservation office, established under chapter 253,
and shall be responsible for establishing, implementing, and
administering federal and state programs or plans for
statewide archaeological and paleontological preservation.
2. The director of the department shall designate a
director of the office who shall serve as the state
archeological officer.
3. At a minimum, the director of the office shall be a
professional archaeologist, as defined in section 194.400.
4. The duties of the office shall include, but shall
not be limited to:
(1) Establishing, implementing, and administering a
statewide plan for archaeological and paleontological
preservation;

SB 1749 2
(2) Providing oversight over any archaeological site
that is at least one hundred and fifty years old. If any
such site is deemed to be holding significant archaeological
value or if there is interest from the land owner on whose
real property the site is located, the office shall conduct
a survey of the site and develop steps to minimize damage to
such site;
(3) Ensuring that all federal laws are followed
pertaining to archaeological and paleontological protection
of archaeological sites;
(4) Working in conjunction with the state historic
preservation office to oversee the implementation of
sections 194.400 to 194.410;
(5) Providing guidance, research assistance, and
technical information concerning the archaeological heritage
of the state;
(6) Coordinating with the state historic preservation
office for the maintenance of the state's archaeological
site files;
(7) Serving as the official repository of the state's
archaeological artifacts, including inventorying, analyzing,
and documenting the state's archaeological and
paleontological resources, and assessing the location of
such resources, including quantity and cultural significance
of such resources;
(8) Working in coordination with any other state
agency on the preservation of archaeological sites; and
(9) Entering into agreements and cooperative efforts
with the following governmental entities concerning
archaeological preservation:
(a) The Federal Highway Administration;
(b) The United States Department of Commerce;

SB 1749 3
(c) The United States Department of Interior;
(d) The United States Department of Agriculture;
(e) The United States Department of Defense; or
(f) Any other governmental agency interested in
archaeological preservation.
5. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓